Tennessee statutes. Title 48 Securities, Corporations And Associations
Chapter 62

Sale of Assets

48-62-101. Sale of the assets in regular course of activities and mortgage of assets.

A corporation may on the terms and conditions and for the consideration determined by the board of directors:

Sell, lease, exchange, or otherwise dispose of any or all of the corporation's assets in the usual and regular course of its activities;

Mortgage, pledge, dedicate to the repayment of indebtedness (whether with or without recourse), or otherwise encumber any or all of the corporation's assets, whether or not in the usual and regular course of business; or

Transfer any or all of the corporation's assets to one (1) or more corporations or other entities all of the memberships or interests of which are owned by the corporation.

Unless the charter or bylaws requires, approval of the members or any other person of a transaction described in subsection (a) is not required.

Acts 1987, ch. 242, § 12.01; 2014, ch. 899, § 73.

Cross-References. Application of nonprofit corporation law, title 48, chs. 51-67, to corporations existing on January 1, 1988, § 48-68-101.

Business corporations, sale of assets, title 48, ch. 22.

Inapplicability of Nonprofit Corporation Act to certain rural electric and community services cooperatives, § 65-25-125.

Law Reviews.

Conversions of Nonprofit Hospitals to For-Profit Status: The Tennessee Experience, 28 U. Mem. L. Rev. 1077 (1998).

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 7 Tenn. Juris., Corporations, §§ 77, 93.

48-62-102. Sale of assets other than in regular course of activities.

A corporation may sell, lease, exchange, or otherwise dispose of all, or substantially all, of its property (with or without the good will) other than in the usual and regular course of its activities, on the terms and conditions and for the consideration determined by the corporation's board, if the proposed transaction is authorized by subsection (b).

The sale, lease, exchange or other disposition of all, or substantially all, of the properties (with or without good will) of one (1) or more subsidiaries of a corporation in which such corporation possesses at least eighty percent (80%) of the total combined voting power of the corporation, or of all classes of membership otherwise entitled to vote for the election of directors, otherwise than in the usual and regular course of business, shall be treated as a disposition within the meaning of this subsection (a) if the subsidiary or subsidiaries constitute all, or substantially all, of the properties of the corporation.

Unless chapters 51-68 of this title, the charter, bylaws, or the board of directors or members (acting pursuant to subsection (d)) require a greater vote or voting by class, the proposed transaction to be authorized must be approved:

By the board;

By the members by two-thirds (2/3) of the votes cast or a majority of the voting power, whichever is less; and

In writing by any person or persons whose approval is required by the charter authorized by § 48-60-301 for an amendment to the charter or bylaws.

If the corporation does not have members, the transaction must be approved by a vote of a majority of the directors in office at the time the transaction is approved and be approved in writing by any person or persons whose approval is required by the charter. The notice required by § 48-58-203(c) of any directors' meeting at which such approval is to be obtained must state that the purpose, or one (1) of the purposes, of the meeting is to consider the sale, lease, exchange, or other disposition of all or substantially all, of the property or assets of the corporation and contain or be accompanied by a copy or summary of a description of the transaction.

The board may condition its submission of the proposed transaction, and the members may condition their approval of the transaction, on receipt of a higher percentage of affirmative votes or on any other basis.

If the corporation seeks to have the transaction approved by the members at a membership meeting, the notice required by § 48-57-105 must state that the purpose, or one (1) of the purposes, of the meeting is to consider the sale, lease, exchange, or other disposition of all, or substantially all, of the property or assets of the corporation and contain or be accompanied by a copy or summary of a description of the transaction.

If approval by the members by written consent or written ballot is required, the material soliciting the approval shall contain or be accompanied by a copy or summary of a description of the transaction.

A public benefit corporation must give written notice to the attorney general and reporter at least forty-five (45) days before it sells, leases, exchanges or otherwise disposes of all, or substantially all, of its property in a transaction not in the usual and regular course of its activities unless the attorney general and reporter has given the corporation a written waiver of this subsection (g).

After a sale, lease, exchange or other disposition of property is authorized, the transaction may be abandoned (subject to any contractual rights), without further action by the members or other person who approved the transaction in accordance with the procedure set forth in the resolution proposing the transaction or, if none is set forth, in the manner determined by the board of directors.

Acts 1987, ch. 242, § 12.02; 2014, ch. 899, § 74.

Cross-References. Inapplicability of Nonprofit Corporation Act to certain rural electric and community services cooperatives, § 65-25-125.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), Nos. 5-2201 — 5-2203.

Attorney General Opinions. Domestic nonprofit water cooperative merging with or transferring assets to municipality, OAG 06-176, 2006 Tenn. AG LEXIS 196 (12/19/06).

48-62-103. Property held in trust or otherwise dedicated to charitable purpose not to be diverted from its purpose — Financial benefit in connection with disposition prohibited — Notice required of transactions not in usual and regular course of activities.

Property held in trust or otherwise dedicated to a charitable purpose may not be diverted from its purpose by a transaction described in § 48-62-101 or § 48-62-102 unless the corporation complies with subsection (c) to the extent required by and pursuant to the law of this state on cy pres or otherwise dealing with the nondiversion of charitable assets.

A person who is a member or otherwise affiliated with a public benefit corporation may not receive a direct or indirect financial benefit in connection with a disposition of assets unless the person is a public benefit corporation or an unincorporated entity that has a charitable purpose. This subsection (b) does not apply to the receipt of reasonable compensation for services rendered.

A public benefit corporation must give written notice to the attorney general and reporter at least forty-five (45) days before it sells, leases, exchanges or otherwise disposes of all, or substantially all, of its property in a transaction not in the usual and regular course of its activities unless the corporation obtains an appropriate order from the court of competent jurisdiction.

Acts 2014, ch. 899, § 75.